zh-TW: 曼陀林面板木材: 阿迪朗達克雲杉木; 碳纖維; 雪松木; 英格曼雲杉木; 相思木; 夾板; 桃花心木; 楓木; 玫瑰木; 西特卡雲杉木; 雲杉木; 胡桃木; 其他
ko: 만돌린 바디 상판 목재: 애디론댁 가문비나무; 탄소 섬유; 삼나무; 엥겔만 가문비나무; 코아; 래미네이트; 마호가니; 단풍나무; 로즈우드; 시트카 가문비나무; 가문비나무; 호두나무; 기타
es: Madera de la tapa superior de la mandolina: Abeto de Adirondack; Fibra de carbono; Cedro; Abeto de Engelmann; Koa; Laminado; Caoba; Arce; Palo de rosa; Abeto de Sitka; Abeto; Nogal; Otro
de: Holz der Mandolinendecke: Adirondack-Fichte; Kohlefaser; Zeder; Engelmann-Fichte; Koa; Laminat; Mahagoni; Ahorn; Palisander; Sitka-Fichte; Fichte; Walnuss; Sonstige
tr: Mandolin üst kapak ahşap türü: Adirondack ladini; Karbon fiber; Sedir; Engelmann ladini; Koa; Lamine; Maun; Akçaağaç; Gül ağacı; Sitka ladini; Ladin; Ceviz; Diğer
pl: Drewno płyty wierzchniej mandoliny: Świerk Adirondack; Włókno węglowe; Cedr; Świerk Engelmanna; Koa; Laminat; Mahoń; Klon; Palisander; Świerk sitkajski; Świerk; Orzech; Inne
hu: Mandolin fedlapjának farésze: Adirondack lucfenyő; Szénszál; Cédrus; Engelmann lucfenyő; Koa; Laminált; Mahagóni; Juhar; Rózsafa; Sitka lucfenyő; Lucfenyő; Dió; Egyéb
vi: Gỗ mặt trên thân đàn mandolin: Vân sam Adirondack; Sợi carbon; Tuyết tùng; Vân sam Engelmann; Koa; Gỗ ép; Gỗ gụ; Phong; Cẩm lai; Vân sam Sitka; Vân sam; Óc chó; Khác
bg-BG: Дърво за горната част на корпуса на мандолина: Адирондакски смърч; Въглеродни влакна; Кедър; Енгелманов смърч; Коа; Ламинат; Махагон; Клен; Палисандър; Ситкански смърч; Смърч; Орех; Друго
fi: Mandoliinin rungon kansi puuta: Adirondackin kuusi; Hiilikuitu; Setri; Engelmanninkuusi; Koa; Laminaatti; Mahonki; Vaahtera; Ruusupuu; Sitkankuusi; Kuusi; Pähkinäpuu; Muu
en: Mandolin body top wood: Adirondack spruce; Carbon fiber; Cedar; Engelmann spruce; Koa; Laminate; Mahogany; Maple; Rosewood; Sitka spruce; Spruce; Walnut; Other
nb: Toppmateriale i mandolinens kropp: Adirondack-gran; Karbonfiber; Seder; Engelmannsgran; Koa; Laminat; Mahogni; Lønn; Palisander; Sitkagran; Gran; Valnøtt; Annet
fr: Bois de la table d’harmonie de la mandoline: Épicéa des Adirondacks; Fibre de carbone; Cèdre; Épicéa d’Engelmann; Koa; Laminé; Acajou; Érable; Palissandre; Épicéa de Sitka; Épicéa; Noyer; Autre
it: Legno della tavola armonica del mandolino: Abete dell’Adirondack; Fibra di carbonio; Cedro; Abete di Engelmann; Koa; Laminato; Mogano; Acero; Palissandro; Abete Sitka; Abete; Noce; Altro
lt-LT: Mandolinos viršutinės dalies mediena: Adirondako eglė; Anglies pluoštas; Kedras; Engelmano eglė; Koa; Laminatas; Raudonmedis; Klevas; Palisandras; Sitkinė eglė; Eglė; Riešutmedis; Kita
sl-SI: Les za vrhnjo ploščo trupa mandoline: Smreka adirondack; Ogljikova vlakna; Cedra; Engelmannova smreka; Koa; Laminat; Mahagonij; Javor; Palisander; Sitkanska smreka; Smreka; Oreh; Drugo
pt-BR: Bandolim tampo madeira: Abeto Adirondack; Fibra de carbono; Cedro; Abeto Engelmann; Koa; Laminado; Mogno; Maple; Jacarandá; Abeto Sitka; Abeto; Nogueira; Outro
da: Trætype i mandolinens krop: Adirondack-gran; Kulfiber; Ceder; Engelmanns-gran; Koa; Laminat; Mahogni; Ahorn; Palisander; Sitka-gran; Gran; Valnød; Andet
zh-CN: 曼陀林琴身面板: 阿迪朗达克云杉; 碳纤维; 雪松; 英格曼云杉; 相思木; 胶合板; 桃花心木; 枫木; 玫瑰木; 西加云杉; 云杉; 胡桃木; 其他
pt-PT: Madeira do tampo do corpo do bandolim: Abeto de Adirondack; Fibra de carbono; Cedro; Abeto de Engelmann; Koa; Laminado; Mogno; Ácer; Jacarandá; Abeto de Sitka; Abeto; Nogueira; Outro
el: Ξύλο για το καπάκι του μαντολίνου: Έλατο Adirondack; Ανθρακόνημα; Κέδρος; Έλατο Engelmann; Κόα; Επικολλητό; Μαόνι; Σφένδαμος; Τριανταφυλλιά; Έλατο Sitka; Έλατο; Καρυδιά; Άλλο
ja: マンドリンのボディトップの木材: アディロンダックスプルース; カーボンファイバー; シダー; イングルマンスプルース; コア; 合板; マホガニー; メイプル; ローズウッド; シトカスプルース; スプルース; ウォルナット; その他
cs: Vrchní deska mandolíny ze dřeva: Smrk Adirondack; Uhlíkové vlákno; Cedr; Smrk Engelmannův; Koa; Laminát; Mahagon; Javor; Palisandr; Smrk Sitka; Smrk; Ořech; Jiné
sk-SK: Drevo na prednú dosku mandolíny: Adirondacký smrek; Uhlíkové vlákno; Céder; Engelmannov smrek; Koa; Laminát; Mahagón; Javor; Palisander; Smrek sitkanský; Smrek; Orech; Iné
th: ไม้ด้านบนตัวแมนโดลิน: แอดิรอนแดคสปรูซ; คาร์บอนไฟเบอร์; ซีดาร์; เอนเกลมันน์สปรูซ; โคอะ; ลามิเนต; มะฮอกกานี; เมเปิล; โรสวูด; ซิตกาสปรูซ; สปรูซ; วอลนัท; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Corp de mandolină din lemn: Molid Adirondack; Fibră de carbon; Cedru; Molid Engelmann; Koa; Laminat; Mahon; Arțar; Palisandru; Molid Sitka; Molid; Nuc; Altele
sv: Träslag för mandolinens lock: Adirondack-gran; Kolfiber; Ceder; Engelmann-gran; Koa; Laminat; Mahogny; Lönn; Palissander; Sitka-gran; Gran; Valnöt; Annat
hr-HR: Gornja ploča tijela mandoline od drveta: Adirondack smreka; Ugljična vlakna; Cedar; Engelmannova smreka; Koa; Laminat; Mahagonij; Javor; Palisander; Sitka smreka; Smreka; Orah; Ostalo
nl: Mandoline bovenblad hout: Adirondack-sparrenhout; Koolstofvezel; Cederhout; Engelmann-sparrenhout; Koa; Laminaat; Mahoniehout; Esdoornhout; Palissanderhout; Sitka-sparrenhout; Sparrenhout; Walnotenhout; Anders
ru: Древесина верхней деки мандолины: Адирондакская ель; Углеродное волокно; Кедр; Ель Энгельмана; Коа; Ламинат; Махагони; Клен; Палисандр; Ситхинская ель; Ель; Орех; Другое